src/fst/phonology.twolc
"Even syllabic verbs I, diphthong opening õ:ä after i:e"
!! **@RULENAME@** - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, in čiõkkâd
 õ:ä <=>
 i:e _ (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+]  NeutrVowLength %^VOWLower: %^PALÄ: ;
 u _ (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+]  NeutrVowLength %^VOWLower: %^PALÄ: ;
!! siõrrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: **play/leikkiä**
!!€ siõ0r0r^VOWLower^PALÄ^PAL^CC2CCC>e
!!€ seäʹrˈr0000>e



!! ### SECONDARY FRONTING



"Even syllabic verbs I, secondary vowel fronting with PAL u õ:e"
!! **@RULENAME@** - deriving +Ind+Prs+Pl3 in VIQQAD: kuõskkâd >kueʹsǩǩe
 õ:e <=>
  u _ (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWLower: %^PALE: ; ! deriving +V+Inf in vueʹlǧǧed

         i _ (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VOWLower: %^PALE: ;
! - deriving +Ind+Prs+Sg3, in kuõskkâd kueʹsǩǩe CHECK THIS
!!€ kuõ0skk^VOWLower^PALE^PAL>e
!!€ kueʹsǩǩ000>e


"Even syllabic verbs I, secondary u > v "
!! **@RULENAME@**
 u:v <=> u _ (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^VY2XYY: ;


!! ### RELATIVE VOWEL LENGTHENING

!! vowel lengthening and consonant shortening, %^Pen: %^V2VV and %^CShort

"Even syllabic verbs I, relative vowel lengthening %^1VOW:â"
!! **@RULENAME@** - deriving +V+Inf in TIETTED: uudd > uʹvdded
 %^1VOW:â <=>
   OnSetC [â|Â] _ (u:|i:|%{VU%}:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: ( %^VOWLower: ) ;
   OnSetC [õ:â|Õ:Â] _ (u:|i:|%{VU%}:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: %^VOWLower: ;
!   OnSetC [â|õ:â|Â|Õ:Â] _ (u:|i:|%{VU%}:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: ;
!! šõddâd+V+Imprt+Sg3:
!!€ šõ^1VOWdd^V2VV^VOWLower>as
!!€ šââdd00>as

!Distinguishing mainstam and maainstam
      OnSetC [â|Â] _ (u:|i:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)  Vow: Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)  %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;
!! nââʹer+N+Sg+Nom **sleep**
!!€ nâ^1VOW0kker^Pen^V2VV^Pen^PAL^Pen^KK2ZERO
!!€ nââʹ00er000000
      [e|E] _ [u (%{ʹØ%}:) |(%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:] Cns:+ NeutrVowLength %^PALÂ: %^PALNo: ;

  â _ %^V2VV: ;
!! radio+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ radio^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ radioo0ʹje

"%^1VOW:ẹ relative vowel lengthening"
!! **@RULENAME@** -
 %^1VOW:ẹ <=>   OnSetC [:ẹ|:Ẹ] _ (i|u) (%{ʹØ%}:0) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: (%^VOWLower:) BetweenPALNoAndMorphRightArrow RBound  ;
!  OnSetC [:ẹ|:Ẹ] _ (i|u) (%{ʹØ%}:0) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: (%^VOWLower:) BetweenPALNoAndMorphRightArrow RBound ;
   OnSetC [ẹ|Ẹ] _ (i|u) (%{ʹØ%}:0) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: (%^VOWLower:) BetweenPALNoAndMorphRightArrow  ;
!! sẹẹr+N+Pl+Nom: ****
!!€ sẹ^1VOWrr^CC2C
!!€ sẹẹr00
!! pess+N+Sg+Acc: **rifle/pyssy**
!!€ pẹ^1VOWss^V2VV
!!€ pẹẹss0
!! veʹrǧǧ+N+Der/lazh+A+Sg+Nom
!!€ vẹ^1VOW{ʹØ}rgg^V2VV^XYY2XY>laž
!!€ vẹẹ0rǥ000>laž
     OnSetC [:ẹ|:Ẹ] _ (i|u) (%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ Vow: Cns: %^Pen: %^V2VV: [%^Pen:0 %^PAL:0| %^Pen:0 %^PALNo:0] ;
!! čẹẹuʹres+N+Sg+Nom = otter
!!€ čẹ^1VOWu{ʹØ}rres^Pen^V2VV^Pen^PAL^Pen^XYY2XY
!!€ čẹẹuʹr0es000000
!! viǯǯâd+V+Imprt+Sg2 **fetch/noutaa**
!!€ vi^1VOWǯǯ^V2VV^VOWLower>as
!!€ vẹẹǯǯ00>as
         OnSetC [:ẹ|:Ẹ] _ (i|u) (%{ʹØ%}:0) Cns:+ Vow: Cns: %^Pen: %^V2VV: (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:) PenBetweenPALNoAndMorph ;
!         OnSetC [:ẹ|:Ẹ] _ (i|u) (%{ʹØ%}:0) Cns:+ Vow: Cns: %^Pen: %^V2VV: (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:) PenBetweenPALNoAndMorphRightArrow RBound ;
!! eelas+N+Sg+Nom:
!!€ ẹ^1VOWllas^Pen^V2VV^Pen^CC2C
!!€ ẹẹl0as0000

"Even syllabic verbs I, relative vowel lengthening %^1VOW:e"
!! **@RULENAME@** - deriving +V+Inf in TIETTED: uudd > uʹvdded
 %^1VOW:e <=> OnSetC [e|E|ẹ:e] _  [:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:ʹ]  Cns:+ [%^V2VV:  %^PAL: |Vow: Cns:* %^Pen: %^V2VV: %^Pen: %^PAL:] ;
!!€ čââʹlmtẹ^1VOW0m^V2VV^PAL
!!€ čââʹlmteeʹm00
!! reeʹǧǧes+A+Sg+Nom: **rich/rikas**
!!€ rẹ^1VOW0gges^Pen^V2VV^Pen^PAL
!!€ rẹẹʹǧǧes0000
        OnSetC [Vow:e|Vow:E] _ (i|u) [:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:ʹ]  Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV:  %^PAL: ;
!!€ pẹ^1VOWi0vv^V2VV^PAL^XYY2XY
!!€ peeiʹv0000
         OnSetC i:e _  (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: %^VOWLower: ;

!Distinguishing mainstam and maainstam
      Cns: Vow:e _ (u:|i:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ (Vow:) Cns:+  %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;
      [ n | š ] Vow:e _ (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) ǩ %{XC%}: %^V2VV: %^PAL: ;
!!€ kaađnẹ^1VOW0ǩ{XC}^V2VV^PAL^C2CC
!!€ kaađneeʹǩǩ000

  e _ %^V2VV: ;
!! Jouste+N+Prop+Sg+Ill
!!€ Jouste^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ Joustee0ʹje


"Even syllabic verbs I, relative vowel lengthening %^1VOW:å"
!! **@RULENAME@** - deriving
 %^1VOW:å <=>
   OnSetC [o:å|Å|O:Å] _ (u:|i:|h:u|v:u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV:  %^VOWLower:  ;
!   OnSetC [å|o:å|Å|O:Å] _ (u:|i:|h:u|v:u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: ( %^VOWLower: ) ;
   OnSetC [å|Å] _ (u:|i:|h:u|v:u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (Vow: [Cns:* (%{XC%}:)] %^Pen:) %^V2VV: NoVowRaise ;
!! sååbbar+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ så^1VOWbbar^Pen^V2VV
!!€ sååbbar00
!!$ så%^1VOWbbar^Pen^V2VV
!!$ så0bbar00
  å _ %^V2VV: ;
!! radio+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ radio^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ radioo0ʹje
   OnSetC å _ (%{ʹØ%}:) h: (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade %^XYY2VY: ;
!!€ jå^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}ss^V2VV^PAL^XYY2VY
!!€ jåå0uʹs0000


"Even syllabic verbs I, relative vowel lengthening %^1VOW:õ"
!! **@RULENAME@** - deriving +V+Inf in TIETTED: uudd > uʹvdded
 %^1VOW:õ <=>
     OnSetC [õ|â:õ|u:õ] _ (u:|i:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: ;
     e õ _ (%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: ;
!     OnSetC Vow:õ _ (u:|i:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: ;
!! âʹlǧǧ+N+Pl+Gen: **boy/poika**
!!€ â^1VOW{ʹØ}lgg^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^XYY2XY>i
!!€ õõʹlj00000>i
!! čâʹlmm+N+Pl+Acc: **eye/silmä**
!!€ čâ^1VOW{ʹØ}lmm^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^XYY2XY>id
!!€ čõõʹlm00000>id
     OnSetC [u:õ|õ|â:õ] _ (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) [ %^V2VV:  | %^Pen: %^V2VV:] ;
!     OnSetC [u:õ|õ] _ (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) [ %^V2VV:  | %^Pen: %^V2VV:] ;
!!€ ču^1VOWkk^V2VV^U2Õ>až
!!€ čõõkk00>až

!Distinguishing mainstam and maainstam
      OnSetC õ _ (u:|i:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns: Cns:* Vow: [Cns:+| %{XC%}:Cns]  %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;

   OnSetC [õ|Õ] _ (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: ;
!!€ võ^1VOWrr^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ võõr000
!!€ sõ^1VOWll^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ sõõl000
!!€ mättʼtõ^1VOWs{XC}^V2VV^K2GG
!!€ mättʼtõõzz00
 OnSetC õ _ (%{ʹØ%}:) h: (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade %^XYY2VY: ;
!!€ sõ^1VOWhss^V2VV^XYY2VY
!!€ sõõus000


"relative vowel lengthening %{õuØ%}:õ"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{õuØ%}:õ <=>
     OnSetC %{õu%}:õ _ (u:|i:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: ;

  õ _ %^V2VV: ;
!! radio+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ radio^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ radioo0ʹje

   OnSetC [u:õ|õ] _ (%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ Vow: Cns:* %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;



"Even syllabic verbs I, relative vowel lengthening %^1VOW:ä"
!! **@RULENAME@** - deriving +V+Inf in TIETTED: uudd > uʹvdded
 %^1VOW:ä <=>
 OnSetC [ä|Ä] _ (i|:u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: BetweenVowHeightAndMorph ;
! OnSetC [ä|Ä] _ (i|:u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: ;
 OnSetC ä _ (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: ([(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2C:|(%^Allegro:) (%^PAL:) %^CC2CAllegro:|%^XYY2XY:]) RBound ;
!!€ ä^1VOWldd^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ ääld000
!!€ jä^1VOWu0rr^V2VV^PAL^CC2C
!!€ jääuʹr0000
   OnSetC ä _ (%{ʹØ%}:) h: (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade %^XYY2VY: ;
!! mäʹhssed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: **pay/maksaa**
!!€ mä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}ss^V2VV^XYY2VY>am
!!€ mää0u0s000>am
!! mäʹhssed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: **pay/maksaa**
!!€ mä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}ss^V2VV^PAL^XYY2VY>et
!!€ mää0uʹs0000>et


 OnSetC [ä|a:ä] _ (u|i) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: ( %^VOWLower: )  BetweenVowHeightAndMorph ;
 OnSetC [ä|a:ä] _ (%{ʹØ%}:) (h:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: ( %^VOWLower: )  BetweenVowHeightAndMorph ;
! OnSetC [å:ä|ä|a:ä] _ (h:u|u|i) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: ( %^VOWLower: )  ;
!Distinguishing mainstam and maainstam
!- kååʹmmerd, maainâst Vowel lengthening in INDPRSSG3 and IMPSG2
    OnSetC ä _ (u|i) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ Vow: Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) [%^Pen: %^V2VV:|%^IMPSG2:|%^INDPRSSG3:] ;
    OnSetC ä _ (%{ʹØ%}:) (h:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ Vow: Cns:* %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;
    OnSetC ä _ (u|i) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ Vow: Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) [%^Pen: %^V2VV:|%^IMPSG2:|%^INDPRSSG3:] ;
    OnSetC ä _ (%{ʹØ%}:) (h:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ Vow: Cns:* %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;

  ä _ %^V2VV: BetweenVowHeightAndMorph ;
!! Määttä+N+Prop+Sg+Ill
!!€ Määttä^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ Määttää0ʹje


"Even syllabic verbs I, relative vowel lengthening %^1VOW:a"
!! **@RULENAME@** - deriving +V+Inf in MAINSTED: maainstam, mainstam
 %^1VOW:a <=>
  OnSetC (i) a _ (i|:u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) %^V2VV: ;
!!€ dura^1VOWk^V2VV
!!€ duraak0
  OnSetC ä: _ (i|:u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: %^VOWRaise: ;
!!€ ä^1VOWldd^V2VV^VOWRaise^CC2C>už
!!€ aald0000>už
!! täiʹdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:
!!€ tä^1VOWi{ʹØ}dd^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^XYY2XY

 OnSetC a _ (%{ʹØ%}:) h: (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade %^XYY2VY: ;
 OnSetC ä: _ (%{ʹØ%}:) h: (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: %^VOWRaise: BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade %^XYY2VY: ;

!! mäʹhssed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **pay/maksaa**
!!€ mä^1VOW{ʹØ}h{ʹØ}ss^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL^XYY2VY>i
!!€ maa0uʹs00000>i

!
  [a|A] _ (i|u)  (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ Vow: Cns:* (%{XC%}:)  %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;
!! taalkâs+N+Sg+Nom

!2016-04   [ b | ʒ | (ǯ) ǯ | (g) g | i b | i n |(k) k |l|m |(n) n | n v|r g|r| r t | u d|u l| u n | u ŋ | u r] _ s t (%^Pen: %^V2VV:) %^IMPSG2: ;
!2016-04   [ ʹ đ đ | ʹ ǩ |ʹ l|ʹ l ǩ |ʹ m m |ʹ p] _ s t %^IMPSG2: ;
   Cns: a _  i  (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns: Vow: Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)  %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;
   Cns: a _  i  Cns: Vow: Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)  %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;
   Cns: a _ (u:|i:) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)  Cns:+ Vow: Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)  [%^Pen: %^V2VV:|%^IMPSG2:|%^INDPRSSG3:] ;


  a _ %^V2VV: ;
!! biologia+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ biologia^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ biologiaa0ʹje


"Relative vowel lengthening %^1VOW:o"
!! **@RULENAME@** -  simultaneous lengthening and lowering: juʹrdded > joordam juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1
 %^1VOW:o <=>
   OnSetC u:o _ (%{ʹØ%}:) [Cns: - v: ] [Cns:* |:Cns*] %^V2VV:  %^VOWLower: ;
   OnSetC u:o _ [%{VU%}:u|(ʹ:|%{ʹØ%}:) v:] (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) [d|l|r|ʒ] %^V2VV:  %^VOWLower: ;
   OnSetC u:o _ [ (ʹ:|%{ʹØ%}:) [ v:|h:] (0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) [d d:|l l:|r r:|ʒ ʒ:|ǯ ǯ:|s s:|t t:| č č: |c c: ] ] %^V2VV:  %^VOWLower: ;

!!€ u^1VOWvdd^V2VV^VOWLower^XYY2VY>če
!!€ ooud0000>če
!! juʹrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1 **think**
!!€ ju^1VOWrdd^V2VV^VOWLower^XYY2XY>am
!!€ joord0000>am
 OnSetC å: _ (%{ʹØ%}:) h: (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ %^V2VV: %^VOWRaise: BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade %^XYY2VY: ;
  å:o _  (i|u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+  %^V2VV: %^VOWRaise: ;
!!€ kå^1VOW0ll^V2VV^VOWRaise^PAL>in
!!€ kooʹll000>in
!!€ tå^1VOWidd^V2VV^VOWRaise^XYY2XY>čed
!!€ tooid0000>čed
   o _ (%{ʹØ%}:) h: (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) (Vow: Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen:)  %^V2VV: ;
   o _ (i|u) (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:) (Vow: Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen:)  %^V2VV: ;
!! oolmaž+N+Sg+Nom: **person/henkilö**
!!€ o^1VOWlmm^V2VV^XYY2XY>až
!!€ oolm000>až
!! Sajos+N+Prop+Sg+Gen:Sajoozz
!!€ Sajo^1VOW{ʹØ}s{XC}^V2VV^K2GG
!!€ Sajoo0zz00
!!$ Sajo^1VOW{ʹØ}s{XC}^V2VV^K2GG
!!$ Sajo00zz00
!! toll+N+Sg+Gen: **fire/tuli**
!!€ to^1VOWll^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ tool000
!!€ to^1VOW0ll^V2VV^PAL^CC2C>e
!!€ tooʹl0000>e
!!€ ko^1VOWnttâr^Pen^V2VV^Pen^XYY2XY
!!€ koont0âr0000
  o _ %^V2VV: ;
!! radio+N+Sg+Ill
!!€ radio^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ radioo0ʹje

"Even syllabic nouns I, relative vowel lengthening i"
!! **@RULENAME@** - ǩiđđ:ǩiiđ
 %^1VOW:i <=> OnSetC [ e:i| ẹ:i ] _ (0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:)  [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] [%^V2VV: %^VOWRaise:| Vow: Cns:+ %^Pen: %^V2VV: %^Pen: %^VOWRaise:]  ;

OnSetC [i|I] _ ((%{ʹØ%}:) h:|u) (%{ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)|Cns:+ (ˈ:|:ˈ) Cns:+] %^V2VV: BetweenVowHeightAndMorph   ;
  OnSetC [Vow:i|Vow:I] _  [(ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) CNoJ:|(%{ʹØ%}:) [h:|u] (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) Cns:+] Vow: Cns:+ (%{XC%}:)  %^Pen: %^V2VV: ;
!Not needed here
!! pirsted+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg
!!€ piirâst
!!€ piirâst
!!€ pẹ^1VOWss^V2VV^VOWRaise>už
!!€ piiss00>už

   OnSetC [i|I] _ (ʹ:|0:ʹ|%{ʹØ%}:) CNoJ: Cns:* [ %^V2VV:| Vow: Cns:* %^Pen: %^V2VV:]  ;
!!€ ǩi^1VOWđđ^V2VV^CC2C
!!€ ǩiiđ000

  i _ %^V2VV: ;
!! Terhi+N+Prop+Sg+Ill
!!€ Terhi^1VOW^V2VVʹje
!!€ Terhii0ʹje
